Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB948.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 524(b), (c) and (d) of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 524. Data to be supplied by electric utilities.* * *(a.1) Electric distribution companies.--Each electric distribution company shall provide the following information to the commission on an annual basis:(1) The capability of the electric distribution company to execute transmission and distribution level load shed, in response to a directive from a regional transmission organization, in a manner that minimizes impact to utility ratepayers in each customer class.123456789101112131415161718 (2) The average duration that customers, in each customer class, would experience a loss of power in response to a load shed directive.(3) The technical considerations and realities that impact the granularity with which a load shed directive can be reasonably executed by the electric distribution company.(4) The extent to which the electric distribution company identifies vital customers and vital facilities, including customers, irrespective of customer class, to whom loss of service would significantly impact health and safety, and the ability of the electric distribution company to minimize service disruptions to consumers who require power for the maintenance of medically necessary equipment.(5) The extent to which the impact of a load shed event on customers identified as vital customers and vital facilities can be minimized by:(i) The duration of a loss of service during a load shed event.(ii) Onsite backup generation.(iii) Supplemental battery power for medical devices.(6) Actions taken in the previous year to facilitate the prioritization of vital customers and vital facilities during load shed events.(7) Whether reasonable notice to customers of an impending load shed event is possible and, if so, an appropriate trigger for the notice of a load shed event.(b) Report.--The commission shall prepare a report summarizing and discussing the data provided pursuant to [subsection (a)] subsections (a) and (a.1) and annually, on or 20250SB0948PN1069 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 before September 1, shall submit the report to the General Assembly, the Governor, the Office of Consumer Advocate and each affected public utility.(c) Regulations.--The commission shall promulgate regulations to establish the specific forms and methods of reporting the information to be submitted pursuant to [subsection (a)] subsections (a) and (a.1).(d) Effect of submission of information.--Neither the submission to the commission of the information required by [subsection (a)] subsections (a) and (a.1) or the issuance by the commission of a report on the information, or anything contained in such reports, or any action taken by the commission as a result of the issuance of such reports, shall be considered or construed as approval or acceptance by the commission of any of the plans, assumptions or calculations made by the public utility and reflected in the information submitted.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0948PN1069 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617